Hawaii, session 2025, HB1238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Manele small boat harbor is the only small boat harbor on the island of Lanai.  The only inter-island ferry in the State travels between Manele harbor and Maalaea harbor on the island of Maui (previously between Manele harbor and Lahaina) and connects residents of Lanai with vital resources available on Maui, including health care and government services. The legislature further finds that Manele small boat harbor needs attention to address environmental concerns.  For example, Manele small boat harbor has been plagued with breaks to its water main, resulting in substantial water spills, the indefinite closure of a primary section of roadway, and hazardous traffic conditions for residents and visitors.  Sea level rise and other climate-related impacts may have also undermined the built infrastructure of the harbor. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to support a structural engineering analysis to determine the integrity of the infrastructure of Manele small boat harbor; for the planning, design, and construction of repairs and improvements to the harbor's water line system; and to facilitate the reopening of a closed section of roadway. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to support a structural engineering analysis to determine the integrity of the infrastructure of Manele small boat harbor; for the planning, design, and construction of repairs and improvements to the harbor's water line system; and to facilitate the reopening of a closed section of roadway. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the division of boating and ocean recreation of the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________